dictsource/en_rules
.group y
         _) y (_         waI
         -) y (-         @   // Welsh names
            y            j
         _) y' (CP2      j@
            y (C_        I
            y (CC        I
       XoB) y (@+        I
         _) y (C@        I
         _) y (n@        V
         _) y (s@        V
       &Ck) y (_S1       i
         C) y (abl       I2
            y (C         I
         C) y            %I
            y (ar        j
            y (Be#       aI
        @C) y (Be#       aI
            ye (_        aI
            y (ear       j
        %B) y (_NS1d     i
        %B) y (_S1d      I
        _C) y (Ce        aI
         C) y (i         I
        &C) y (an_      =I
        &C) y (en_      =I
            y (iC_       j
        sf) y (_         aI
        Cf) y (_         %I
       %Af) y (_         %I
        _C) y            aI
        _C) y (ph        aI
            y (st        I
        XC) y            aI
        CC) y (n_        I
            y (na_       'i:
//      Cr) y            %I
       _sC) y            aI
        _b) y (+         aI
         c) y (cl        aI
         c) y (clic_     aI
       bic) y (cl        I
      ereb) y (_         aI
      earb) y (_         aI
         h) y (Cr        aI
         c) y (lin       I
         c) y (r         I
        th) y (l_        aI
        fl) y            aI
        fl) y (n         I
        gl) y (ph        I
         k) y (l_        aI
         n) y (l_        aI
         t) y (l_        aI
        &C) y (lene_     =I
            y (lum       aI
            yang         j'aN           // chinese names
         d) ynam         aInam
        @C) y (mAn_      I
         w) y (n         I
        gl) y (cer       I
         d) yse (n       Is@
         f) y (_         aI
        ff) y (_         I
       &sk) y (_         =i
       den) y (_         aI
       bel) y (_         aI
         &) y (_         %I
         &) y (_N        %i
            y (_         aI
            y (Cic_      'I
            y (Cical     'I
            y (Cify      'I
        _s) y            I
         @) y (ra_       'aI
         s) yring        I2rIndZ
            yse (_+      aIz
            ysing (_     aIzI2N
            ysed (_      aIzd
            yzed (_      aIzd
         &) ysis (_      =@sIs
            yte (_       aIt
            you'         %ju:
            yu (@        ju:
            yeo (C       joU
            y (er_       aI
         C) yes (_       aIz
         _) yes          jEs
            yeah         jEh
            yew          ju:
        @C) y (gen       I
?!3      d) y (nas       I
         s) ynch         Ink
         t) y (pist      aI
         t) y (pic       I
         t) y (p_        aI
            y (pal       'aI
         h) ypocri (t    Ip@krI
         h) y (pocr      %I
         t) y (rann      I
        ph) ys (i        Iz
            yr (_        @
            yre (_       aI3
         c) y (ni        I
         l) y (ri        I
         p) y (ra        I
         p) y (ri        I
         p) y (th        aI
            y (the_      aI
        st) y (re        aI
         C) yx (_        Iks
         t) yone (_      Iw'0n
?6       t) yone (_      Iw'Vn
         t) ytwo (_      It'u:
         t) yfour (_     If'o@
         t) yfive (_     If'aIv
         t) yseven (_    Is'Ev@n
         t) yeight (_    I'eIt

.group z
            z            z
            z (z
         _) zh (Y        Z
         _) z (lot       z
         _) zs (Y        z
         _) z (wY        z

         n) z (_N        ts
         @) zales (_     z'A:l@s
            zei          zaI
            zes (_       zI2z
            zh           Z
            zu (_        =zu:
            zue          zw'eI
            zure         Z3
            zo (olo      zu:

.group E
            E                    // silent 'e' , ignore by default
            E (B_        @
            E (BC_       @
            E (BCe_      @
            E (Cia       'i:
            Ea (_        =i@
            Ea (n_       'i@
            Ectomy (_S6  'Ekt@mI
        @@) Ed (_S2vei   d
        &C) Ed (_S2vei   d#
        &c) Ed (_S2vei   t
        &d) Ed (_S2vei   I#d
       &ch) Ed (_S2vei   t
        &k) Ed (_S2vei   t
       ril) Ed (_S2      d
     &@@om) Ed (_S2v     d
        &p) Ed (_S2vei   t
        &t) Ed (_S2vei   I#d
        ur) Ed (_S1vi    d
        &x) Ed (_S2v     t
         y) Ed (_        d
            Edly (_S4e   Idl%I
            E (dia_      i:
            E (dic_      i:
       nak) E (d         I
            Ee (d        i:
            EE (_        i:
            Ee (_        i:
            Eer (_       'i@3
            Ei (n_       i:
            Ei (_        aI
            El (_        @L
?8          El (_        El
            Ele (_       @L
            Ell (+       @L
            Ella (_      'El@
            Em (_        @m
         @) E (mber      'E
            Eme (_       i:m
            Em (ic_      'i:m
            Ensk (_      'Ensk
            En (_        @n
?8          En (_        En
            En (atA      @n
            En (dA_      'En
            E (ndous     E
            Ener (_      _n@
            Ening (_     _nI2N
?8          Ening (_     EnI2N
            Ene (_       i:n
            Ened (_      @nd
            En (g        @n
            E (nt        @
            E (ning      E
            E (nti       'E
            E (ntu       'E
            E (ntous     'E
            E (o_        I2
            Eous (_      =i@s
         l) E (ps        E
         l) E (pt        E
            Eri (A       'i@rI2
            Er (ie_      @r
            Er (ic_      Er
            Er (ous_     @r
            Er (_        3
        ad) Er (_S1      3
        ad) Ers (_S2     3z
            Er (C        3
            Ery (_       @r%I
            E (x_        E
         &) Es (_S2e     z
         c) Es (_S2e     I#z
         c) E's (_S3e    I#z
         f) Es (_S2e     z#
         g) Es (_S2e     I#z
        ch) Es (_S2e     I#z
        ph) Es (_S2e     I#z
         k) Es (_S2e     z#
         p) Es (_S2e     z#
         s) Es (_S2e     I#z
         s) E's (_S2e    I#z
        sh) Es (_S2e     I#z
         t) Es (_S2e     z#
         x) Es (_S2      I#z
        Cr) Es (_S2e     @z
            Ese (_       'i:z
            E (sia       'i:
            Esque        'Esk
            E (ss        E
            Ess (_       Es
            E (te_       i:
            Etry (_S2    rI
            E (tric      E
            Etta (_      'Et@
            Ette (_      'Et
            E (tic_      E
            Eum (_       i:@m
            Eus (_       I2@s
            Ew (_        u:
        ob) Ey (_        eI
            E (z_        E


.group '
            's (_S2m     z
         f) 's (_S2m      s
         p) 's (_S2m      s
         t) 's (_S2m      s
         k) 's (_S2m      s
        se) 's (_S2m      I2z
         s) 's (_S2m      I2z
        ce) 's (_S2m      I2z
        ch) 's (_S2m      I2z
       och) 's (_S2m      s
        sh) 's (_S2m      I2z
         x) 's (_S2m      I2z
         z) 's (_S2m      I2z
        6_) 's (_        I2z
       16_) 's (_        z
            're (_S3     @
            've (_S3     @v
            'd (_S2      d
            'll (_S3     @L


.group 0xce   // Greek letters
// 0xce is the first byte of the utf-8 code for these characters

	α	'alf@_
	ά	'alf@_
	β	b'i:t@_
?3	β	b'eIt@_
	γ	g'am@_
	δ	d'Elt@_
	ε	'EpsIl0n_
	έ	'EpsIl0n_
	ζ	z'i:t@_
	η	'i:t@_
	ή	'i:t@_
	θ	T'i:t@_
	ι	aI'oUt@_
	ί	aI'oUt@_
	κ	k'ap@_
	λ	l'amd@_
	μ	m'ju:_
	ν	n'ju:_
	ξ	ks'aI_
	ο	'oUmIkr0n_

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters

	π	p'aI_
	ρ	r'oU_
	σ	s'Igm@_
	ς	s'Igm@_
	τ	t'aU_
	υ	'UpsIl0n_
	ύ	'UpsIl0n_
	φ	f'aI_
	χ	tS'aI_
	ψ	ps'aI_
	ω	'oUmIg@_
?3	ω	oUm'eIg@_
	ώ	'oUmIg@_
	ό	'oUmIkr0n_


// default group for "non of the above"

.group

// non-ascii characters with specified pronunciations
// List the accented characters in en_list with the $accent attribute
	á (X    'A:
	à	a
	é	eI
	é (X    'eI
	é (CA_  'eI
     _) é	%I
	ée      i:
	ê	E:
	ä	E
	ë	E
	ï	i:
	ó (n	'0
	ö	3:
	ör      3:
	ü	u:
	û	u:
	ç	s
	ß	s
	č	tS
	š	S
	ş	S
	ž	Z
	þ	T
	ð	D
//	ñ	nj
	ñ	_^_ES

     _) ʻ (A    ?   // arabic

            '
            !           _:Ekskl@meIS@n_:
            ! (\!
            :            koUl@n
        D_) : (_DD_             // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
            $            d0l3
            !=           n0ti:kw@Lz
            >=           greIt@O@i:kw@L
            <=           lEsO@i:kw@L


        __) - (_D        maIn@s
        D_) - (_D        daS
         _) - (_D        _


            .           d0t
            . (.        _:
        \.) .
